Rhode Island, session 2025, SB35.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 16-9 of the General Laws entitled "School Funds and Property" is
hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
16-9-11. New school construction and renovations.
Not later than June 30, 2026, the department of education and the office of energy resources
are hereby authorized and directed to develop and adopt regulations requiring all school buildings
to meet the latest Northeast Collaborative for High Performance Schools (NE-CHPS) standard of
zero energy capable, as required by 200-RICR-20-05-04.5.1B, and defined in § 16-7-36, by
December 31, 2037.
(1) The regulations shall allow flexibility to the furthest extent possible for local education
agencies to pursue state and federal funding sources that assist in financing energy efficiency or
renewable energy systems without any penalties or reduction in state housing aid provided by the
department of education.
(2) Furthermore, for local education agencies that pursue federal funding for renewable
energy systems, the department’s regulations shall direct and provide further guidance to local
education agencies to build, own, and operate solar panels utilizing federal guidance established in
the Internal Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C. § 6417.
SECTION 2. Sections 16-7-36, 16-7-39, 16-7-40 and 16-7-41.1 of the General Laws in
Chapter 16-7 entitled "Foundation Level School Support [See Title 16 Chapter 97 — The Rhode
Island Board of Education Act]" are hereby amended to read as follows:

16-7-36. Definitions.
The following words and phrases used in §§ 16-7-35 to 16-7-47 and in § 16-9-11 have the
following meanings:
(1) “Adjusted equalized weighted assessed valuation” means the equalized weighted
assessed valuation for a community as determined by the division of property valuation within the
department of revenue in accordance with § 16-7-21; provided, however, that in the case of a
regional school district the commissioner of elementary and secondary education shall apportion
the adjusted equalized weighted assessed valuation of the member cities or towns among the
regional school district and the member cities or towns according to the proportion that the number
of pupils of the regional school district bears to the number of pupils of the member cities or towns.
(2) “Approved project” means a project which has complied with the administrative
regulations governing §§ 16-7-35 through 16-7-47, and which has been authorized to receive state
school housing reimbursement by the commissioner of elementary and secondary education.
(3) “Commissioning agent” means a person or entity who ensures that systems are
designed, installed, functionally tested, and capable of being operated and maintained to perform
in conformity with the design intent of a project.
(4) “Community” means any city, town, or regional school district established pursuant to
law; provided, however, that the member towns of the Chariho regional high school district, created
by P.L. 1958, ch. 55, as amended, shall constitute separate and individual communities for the
purposes of distributing the foundation level school support for school housing for all grades
financed in whole or in part by the towns irrespective of any regionalization.
(5) “Facilities condition index” means the cost to fully repair the building divided by the
cost to replace the building as determined by the school building authority.
(6) “Functional utilization” means the ratio of the student population within a school
facility to the capacity of the school facility to adequately serve students as defined by the school
building authority.
(7) “Maintenance expenditures” means amounts spent for repairs or replacements for the
purpose of keeping a school facility open and safe for use, including repairs, maintenance, and
replacements to a school facility’s heating, lighting, ventilation, security, and other fixtures to keep
the facility or fixtures in effective working condition. Maintenance shall not include contracted or
direct custodial or janitorial services, expenditures for the cleaning of a school facility or its
fixtures, the care and upkeep of grounds, recreational facilities, or parking lots, or the cleaning of
or repairs and replacements to movable furnishings or equipment.
(8) “Owner’s program manager” means owner’s program manager as defined in § 37-2-7.
LC000592 - Page 2 of 12

(9) “Prime contractor” means the construction contractor who is responsible for the
completion of a project.
(10) “Reference year” means the year next prior to the school year immediately preceding
that in which aid is to be paid.
(11) “Subject to inflation” means the base amount multiplied by the percentage of increase
in the Producer Price Index (PPI) Data for Nonresidential Building Construction (NAICS 236222)
as published by the United States Department of Labor, Bureau of Labor Statistics determined as
of September 30 of the prior calendar year.
(12) "Zero energy capable" means the building:
(i) Meets the latest Northeast Collaborative for High Performance Schools (NE-CHPS)
standard of a zero energy capable school building whereby the actual annual energy delivered other
than as described in subsection (12)(ii) of this section, must be less than or equal to the renewable
energy generated onsite; or
(ii) The actual annual energy delivered must be less than or equal to the sum of:
(A) The renewable energy generated onsite;
(B) The renewable energy generated offsite through a power purchase agreement; and
(C) The value of purchased NE-GIS certificates that meet the standard for a new renewable
energy resources as defined in § 39-26-2.
16-7-39. Computation of school housing-aid ratio.
For each community, the percent of state aid for school housing costs shall be computed in
the following manner:
(1) The adjusted equalized weighted assessed valuation for the district is divided by the
resident average daily membership for the district (grades twelve (12) and below); (2) The adjusted
equalized weighted assessed valuation for the state is divided by the resident average daily
membership for the state (grades twelve (12) and below); (1) is then divided by (2) and the resultant
ratio is multiplied by a factor currently set at sixty-two percent (62%) which represents the
approximate average district share of school support; the resulting product is then subtracted from
one hundred percent (100%) to yield the housing aid share ratio, provided that in no case shall the
ratio be less than thirty percent (30%). Provided, that effective July 1, 2010, and annually at the
start of each fiscal year thereafter, the thirty percent (30%) floor on said housing-aid share shall be
increased by five percent (5%) increments each year until said floor on the housing-aid share ratio
reaches a minimum of not less than forty percent (40%). This provision shall apply only to school
housing projects completed after June 30, 2010, that received approval from the board of regents
prior to June 30, 2012. Provided further, for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2012, and for
LC000592 - Page 3 of 12

subsequent fiscal years, the minimum housing aid share shall be thirty-five percent (35%) for all
projects receiving council on elementary and secondary education approval after June 30, 2012.
The resident average daily membership shall be determined in accordance with § 16-7-22(1).
(2) No district shall receive a combined total of more than twenty (20) incentive percentage
points for projects that commence construction by June 30, 2024, and five (5) incentive points for
projects that commence construction thereafter; provided further, these caps shall be in addition to
amounts received under §§ 16-7-40(a)(1) and, 16-7-40(a)(2), 16-7-40(j)(1) and 16-7-40(j)(2)..
Furthermore, a district’s share shall not be decreased by more than half of its regular share
irrespective of the number of incentive points received nor shall a district’s state share increase by
more than half of its regular share, including amounts received under §§ 16-7-40(a)(1) and 16-7-
40(a)(2), irrespective of the number of incentive points received. Provided further that the
aforementioned limit on the state share increasing by more than half of its regular share shall not
apply to projects submitted for reimbursement after July 1, 2023.
16-7-40. Increased school housing ratio.
(a)(1) In the case of regional school districts, the school housing aid ratio shall be increased
by two percent (2%) for each grade so consolidated.
(2) Regional school districts undertaking renovation project(s) shall receive an increased
share ratio of four percent (4%) for those specific project(s) only, in addition to the combined share
ratio calculated in § 16-7-39 and this subsection.
(b) In the case of projects undertaken by districts specifically for the purposes of school
safety and security, the school housing aid share ratio shall be increased by five percent (5%) for
these specific projects only, in the calculation of school housing aid. The increased share ratio shall
continue to be applied for as long as the project(s) receives state housing aid. In order to qualify for
the increased share ratio, seventy-five percent (75%) of the project costs must be specifically
directed to school safety and security measures. The council on elementary and secondary
education shall promulgate rules and regulations for the administration and operation of this
section.
(c) For purposes of addressing health and safety deficiencies as defined by the school
building authority, including the remediation of hazardous materials, the school housing aid ratio
shall be increased by five percent (5%) so long as the construction of the project commences by
June 30, 2024, is completed by June 30, 2029, and a two hundred fifty million dollar ($250,000,000)
general obligation bond is approved on the November 2018 ballot. In order to qualify for the
increased share ratio, twenty-five percent (25%) of the project costs or a minimum of five hundred
thousand dollars ($500,000) must be specifically directed to this purpose.
LC000592 - Page 4 of 12

(d) For purposes of educational enhancement, including projects devoted to the
enhancement of early childhood education and career and technical education, the school housing
aid ratio shall be increased by five percent (5%) so long as construction of the project commences
by June 30, 2024, is completed by June 30, 2029, and a two hundred fifty million dollar
($250,000,000) general obligation bond is approved on the November 2018 ballot. In order to
qualify for the increased share ratio, twenty-five percent (25%) of the project costs or a minimum
of five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) must be specifically directed to these purposes.
(e) For replacement of a facility that has a facilities condition index of sixty-five percent
(65%) or higher, the school housing ratio shall be increased by five percent (5%) so long as
construction of the project commences by June 30, 2024, is completed by June 30, 2029, does not
receive a bonus pursuant to subsection (f) or subsection (g), and a two hundred fifty million dollar
($250,000,000) general obligation bond is approved on the November 2018 ballot. In order to
qualify for the increased share ratio, twenty-five percent (25%) of the project costs or a minimum
of five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) must be specifically directed to this purpose.
(f) For any new construction or renovation that increases the functional utilization of any
facility from less than sixty percent (60%) to more than eighty percent (80%), including the
consolidation of school buildings within or across districts, the school housing aid ratio shall be
increased by five percent (5%) so long as construction of the project commences by June 30, 2024,
is completed by June 30, 2029, and a two hundred fifty million dollar ($250,000,000) general
obligation bond is approved on the November 2018 ballot. In order to qualify for the increased
share ratio, twenty-five percent (25%) of the project costs or a minimum of five hundred thousand
dollars ($500,000) must be specifically directed to this purpose.
(g) For any new construction or renovation that decreases the functional utilization of any
facility from more than one hundred twenty percent (120%) to between eighty-five percent (85%)
to one hundred five percent (105%), the school housing ratio shall be increased by five percent
(5%) so long as construction of the project commences by June 30, 2024, is completed by June 30,
2029, and a two hundred fifty million dollar ($250,000,000) general obligation bond is approved
on the November 2018 ballot. In order to qualify for the increased share ratio, twenty-five percent
(25%) of the project costs or a minimum of five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) must be
specifically directed to this purpose.
(h) For consolidation of two (2) or more school buildings, within or across districts into
one school building, the school housing aid ratio shall be increased by five percent (5%) so long as
construction of the project commences by June 30, 2024, is completed by June 30, 2029, a two
hundred fifty million dollar ($250,000,000) general obligation bond is approved on the November
LC000592 - Page 5 of 12

2018 ballot, and does not receive a bonus pursuant to subsection (f) or subsection (g). In order to
qualify for the increased share ratio, twenty-five percent (25%) of the project costs or a minimum
of five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) must be specifically directed to this purpose.
(i) Any regionalized and/or non-regionalized school district receiving an increased share
ratio for a project approved prior to July 1, 2018, shall continue to receive the increased share ratio
for as long as the project receives state housing aid.
(j)(1) In the case of projects undertaken by districts specifically for the purposes of high-
performance school design, the school housing aid share ratio shall be increased by five percent
(5%) for these specific projects only, in the calculation of school housing aid. The increased share
ratio shall continue to be applied for as long as the project(s) receives state housing aid. In order to
qualify for the increased share ratio, seventy-five percent (75%) of the project costs shall be
specifically directed to this purpose. The council on elementary and secondary education shall
promulgate rules and regulations for the administration and operation of this section.
(2) For any new construction or renovation that includes energy efficiency and renewable
energy upgrades for the building to meet the standard of zero energy capable school building
pursuant to § 16-7-36(12), the school housing aid ratio shall be increased by ten percent (10%).
16-7-41.1. Eligibility for reimbursement.
(a) School districts, not municipalities, may apply for and obtain approval for a project
under the necessity of school construction process set forth in the regulations of the council on
elementary and secondary education, provided, however, in the case of a municipality that issues
bonds through the Rhode Island health and educational building corporation to finance or refinance
school facilities for a school district that is not part of the municipality, the municipality may apply
for and obtain approval for a project. Such approval will remain valid until June 30 of the third
fiscal year following the fiscal year in which the council on elementary and secondary education’s
approval is granted. Only those projects undertaken at school facilities under the care and control
of the school committee and located on school property may qualify for reimbursement under §§
16-7-35 — 16-7-47. Facilities with combined school and municipal uses or facilities that are
operated jointly with any other profit or nonprofit agency do not qualify for reimbursement under
§§ 16-7-35 — 16-7-47. Projects completed by June 30 of a fiscal year are eligible for
reimbursement in the following fiscal year. A project for new school housing or additional housing
shall be deemed to be completed when the work has been officially accepted by the school
committee or when the housing is occupied for its intended use by the school committee, whichever
is earlier.
(b) Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, the board of regents shall not grant final
LC000592 - Page 6 of 12

approval for any project between June 30, 2011, and May 1, 2015, except for projects that are
necessitated by immediate health and safety reasons. In the event that a project is requested during
the moratorium because of immediate health and safety reasons, those proposals shall be reported
to the chairs of the house and senate finance committees.
(c) Any project approval granted prior to the adoption of the school construction
regulations in 2007, and which are currently inactive; and any project approval granted prior to the
adoption of the school construction regulations in 2007 which did not receive voter approval or
which has not been previously financed, are no longer eligible for reimbursement under this
chapter. The department of elementary and secondary education shall develop recommendations
for further cost containment strategies in the school housing aid program.
(d) Beginning July 1, 2015, the council on elementary and secondary education shall
approve new necessity of school construction applications on an annual basis. The department of
elementary and secondary education shall develop an annual application timeline for local
education agencies seeking new necessity of school construction approvals.
(e) Beginning July 1, 2019, no state funding shall be provided for projects in excess of ten
million dollars ($10,000,000) unless the prime contractor for the project has received
prequalification from the school building authority.
(f) Beginning July 1, 2019, the necessity of school construction process set forth in the
regulations of the council on elementary and secondary education shall include a single statewide
process, developed with the consultation of the department of environmental management, that will
ensure community involvement throughout the investigation and remediation of contaminated
building sites for possible reuse as the location of a school. That process will fulfill all provisions
of § 23-19.14-5 related to the investigation of reuse of such sites for schools.
(g) Beginning July 1, 2019, school housing projects exceeding one million five hundred
thousand dollars ($1,500,000) subject to inflation shall include an owner’s program manager and a
commissioning agent. The cost of the program manager and commissioning agent shall be
considered a project cost eligible for aid pursuant to §§ 16-7-41 and 16-105-5.
(h) Temporary housing, or swing space, for students shall be a reimbursable expense so
long as a district can demonstrate that no other viable option to temporarily house students exists
and provided that use of the temporary space is time limited for a period not to exceed twenty-four
(24) months and tied to a specific construction project.
(i) Environmental site remediation, as defined by the school building authority, shall be a
reimbursable expense up to one million dollars ($1,000,000) per project.
(j) If, within thirty (30) years of construction, a newly constructed school is sold to a private
LC000592 - Page 7 of 12

entity, the state shall receive a portion of the sale proceeds equal to that project’s housing aid
reimbursement rate at the time of project completion.
(k) All projects must comply with § 37-13-6, ensuring that prevailing wage laws are being
followed, and § 37-14.1-6, ensuring that minority business enterprises reach the required minimum
participation, and § 37-13-3.1, ensuring apprenticeship program utilization.
(l) Using reviewable criteria, all projects seeking school housing aid shall complete an
independent, objective, reasoned study on all projects over ten million dollars ($10,000,000) to
determine whether adoption of a project labor agreement on the proposed project or projects will
help achieve the goals of the state purchases act.
SECTION 3. Section 16-105-3 of the General Laws in Chapter 16-105 entitled "School
Building Authority" is hereby amended to read as follows:
16-105-3. Roles and responsibilities.
The school building authority roles and responsibilities shall include:
(1) Management of a system with the goal of ensuring equitable and adequate school
housing for all public school children in the state;
(2) Prevention of the cost of school housing from interfering with the effective operation
of the schools;
(3) Management of school housing aid in accordance with statute;
(4) Reviewing and making recommendations to the council on elementary and secondary
education on necessity of school construction applications for state school housing aid and the
school building authority capital fund, based on the recommendations of the school building
authority advisory board;
(5) Promulgating, managing, and maintaining school construction regulations, standards,
and guidelines applicable to the school housing program, based on the recommendations of the
school building authority advisory board, created in § 16-105-8. Said regulations shall require
conformance with the minority business enterprise requirements set forth in § 37-14.1-6 and with
the latest Northeast Collaborative for High Performance Schools (NE-CHPS) standards or
equivalent, contingent on approval from the council on elementary and secondary education;
(6) Developing a prequalification and review process for prime contractors, architects, and
engineers seeking to bid on projects in excess of ten million dollars ($10,000,000) in total costs
subject to inflation. Notwithstanding any general laws to the contrary, a prequalification shall be
valid for a maximum of two (2) years from the date of issuance. Factors to be considered by the
school building authority in granting a prequalification to prime contractors shall include, but not
be limited to, the contractor’s history of completing complex projects on time and on budget, track
LC000592 - Page 8 of 12

record of compliance with applicable environmental and safety regulations, evidence that
completed prior projects prioritized the facility’s future maintainability, and compliance with
applicable requirements for the use of women and minority owned subcontractors;
(i) At least annually, a list of prequalified contractors, architects, and engineers shall be
publicly posted with all other program information;
(7) Providing technical assistance and guidance to school districts on the necessity of
school construction application process;
(8) Providing technical advice and assistance, training, and education to cities, towns,
and/or local education agencies and to general contractors, subcontractors, construction or project
managers, designers and others in planning, maintenance, and establishment of school facility
space;
(9) Developing a project priority system, based on the recommendations of the school
building authority advisory board, in accordance with school construction regulations for the school
building authority capital fund, subject to review and, if necessary, to be revised on intervals not to
exceed five (5) years. Project priorities shall include, but not be limited to, the following order of
priorities:
(i) Projects to replace or renovate a building that is structurally unsound or otherwise in a
condition seriously jeopardizing the health and safety of school children where no alternative exists;
(ii) Projects needed to prevent loss of accreditation;
(iii) Projects needed for the replacement, renovation, or modernization of the HVAC
system in any schoolhouse to increase energy conservation and decrease energy-related costs in
said schoolhouse;
(iv) Projects needed to replace or add to obsolete buildings in order to provide for a full
range of programs consistent with state and approved local requirements; and
(v) Projects needed to comply with mandatory, instructional programs;
(10) Maintaining a current list of requested school projects and the priority given them;
(11) Collecting and maintaining readily available data on all the public school facilities in
the state;
(12) Collecting, maintaining, and making publicly available quarterly progress reports of
all ongoing school construction projects that shall include, at a minimum, the costs of the project
and the time schedule of the project;
(13) Recommending policies and procedures designed to reduce borrowing for school
construction programs at both state and local levels;
(14) At least every five (5) years, conducting a needs survey to ascertain the capital
LC000592 - Page 9 of 12

construction, reconstruction, maintenance, and other capital needs for schools in each district of the
state, including public charter schools. Beginning in 2025, this needs survey shall include progress
towards and recommendations for energy efficiency and renewable energy upgrades to bring all
state school buildings to the definition of a zero energy capable school building pursuant to § 16-
7-36;
(15) Developing a formal enrollment projection model or using projection models already
available;
(16) Encouraging local education agencies to investigate opportunities for the maximum
utilization of space in and around the district;
(17) Collecting and maintaining a clearinghouse of prototypical school plans that may be
consulted by eligible applicants;
(18) Retaining the services of consultants, as necessary, to effectuate the roles and
responsibilities listed within this section;
(19) Hiring an appropriate staff member who shall create and implement a plan to bring all
Rhode Island school buildings in compliance with the standard of a zero energy capable school
building pursuant to § 16-7-36 and who shall provide technical advice and assistance, training, and
education to cities, towns, and/or local education agencies, and to general contractors,
subcontractors, construction or project managers, designers and others on the latest NE-CHPS
standards; and
(19)(20) No district shall receive a combined total of more than twenty (20) incentive
percentage points for projects that commence construction by December 30, 2023, and five (5)
incentive points for projects that commence construction thereafter; provided further, these caps
shall be in addition to amounts received under §§ 16-7-40(a)(1), and 16-7-40(a)(2), 16-7-40(j)(1),
and 16-7-40(j)(2). Furthermore, a district’s share shall not be decreased by more than half of its
regular share irrespective of the number of incentive points received, nor shall a district’s state
share increase by more than half of its regular share, including amounts received under §§ 16-7-
40(a)(1) and 16-7-40(a)(2), irrespective of the number of incentive points received.
Notwithstanding any provision of the general laws to the contrary, the reimbursement or aid
received under this chapter or chapter 38.2 of title 45 shall not exceed one hundred percent (100%)
of the sum of the total project costs plus interest costs. If a two hundred and fifty million dollar
($250,000,000) general obligation bond is approved on the November 2018 ballot, projects
approved between May 1, 2015, and January 1, 2018, are eligible to receive incentive points (above
and beyond what the project was awarded at the time of approval) pursuant to § 16-7-39 and § 16-
7-40. Provided, however, any project approved during this time period with a project cost in excess
LC000592 - Page 10 of 12

of one million five hundred thousand dollars ($1,500,000), which does not include an owner’s
program manager and a commissioning agent, shall only be eligible to receive five (5) incentive
points. Incentive points awarded pursuant to the provisions of this subsection shall only be applied
to reimbursements occurring on or after July 1, 2018. Any project approved between May 1, 2015,
and January 1, 2018, that is withdrawn and/or resubmitted for approval shall not be eligible for any
incentive points.
SECTION 4. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC000592
========
LC000592 - Page 11 of 12